Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,232
Saving provisions.

(MBCA 17.03) (a) Except as provided in subsection
(b) of this section, the repeal of a statute by Laws 2014, LB749, does not
affect:

(1) The operation of the
statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

(2) Any ratification, right,
remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred
under the statute before its repeal;

(3) Any violation of the statute, or any penalty,
forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal;
or

(4)
Any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution commenced under the statute
before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may
be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

(b) If a penalty or punishment
imposed for violation of a statute repealed by Laws 2014, LB749, is reduced
by Laws 2014, LB749, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall
be imposed in accordance with Laws 2014, LB749.

(c) In the event that any provisions
of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act are deemed to modify, limit,
or supersede the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., as the act existed on January 1, 2014, the provisions
of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act shall control to the maximum
extent permitted by section 102(a)(2) of that federal act, 15 U.S.C. 7002(a)(2).

Laws 2014, LB749, § 232.